Maryland, session 2025, HB0692.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) The Maryland Transportation Authority shall conduct a study on the
feasibility of capturing the image of only the rear license plate of a vehicle, rather than
images of both the front and rear license plates, at video toll facilities in the State.
(b) The study required under subsection (a) of this section shall identify:
(1) any system and equipment upgrades necessary to reliably capture the
image of the rear license plate of a vehicle at a video toll facility; and
(2) any potential impacts that may occur as the result of capturing the
image of only the rear license plate of a vehicle rather than both the front and rear license
plates.
(c) On or before December 1, 2025, the Authority shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0692*